incubator/apertium-ell-eng/dev/apertium-en-el.el.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>

<dictionary>
<alphabet>ΑΒΓΔΕΖΗΘΙΚΛΜΝΞΟΠΡΣΤΥΦΧΨΩαβγδεζηθικλμνξοπρστυφχψωςάέήίόύώΐΰϋϊἱΆΈΉΊΌΎΏΫΪ</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"      c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="np"     c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="pr"     c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="part"   c="Particle"/>
    <sdef n="prn"    c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="num"    c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="adj"    c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="adv"    c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"  c="Verb"/>
    <sdef n="nom"    c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="gen"    c="Genitive"/>
    <sdef n="acc"    c="Accusative"/>
    <sdef n="voc"    c="Vocative"/>
    <sdef n="det"    c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="ind"    c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="def"    c="Defininite"/>
    <sdef n="sp"     c="Singular / Plural"/>
    <sdef n="sg"     c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"     c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="p1"     c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"     c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"     c="Third person"/>
    <sdef n="f"      c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="m"      c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="nt"     c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="mf"     c="Masculine / Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="pst"    c="Positive"/>
    <sdef n="comp"   c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="sup"    c="Superlative"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub" c="Sub-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="enc"    c="Enclitic"/>
    <sdef n="itg"    c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="neg"    c="Negative"/>
    <sdef n="pri"    c="Present indicative"/>
    <sdef n="pii"    c="Past imperfect (continuous)"/>
    <sdef n="aor"    c="Aorist"/>
    <sdef n="past"   c="Past"/>
    <sdef n="ger"    c="Gerund"/>
    <sdef n="top"    c="Toponym"/>
    <sdef n="ant"    c="Anthroponym"/>
    <sdef n="sent"   c="Sentence boundary"/>
	<sdef n="subj"	 c="Subject"/>
	<sdef n="obj"	 c="Object"/>
  </sdefs>


   <pardefs>


	<!-- SECTION: Challenge Text Nouns -->
	<pardef n="γραμμόφων__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>α</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>	

	<pardef n="κήπ__n">
    	<e><p><l>ος</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>οι</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="καιρ__n">
    	<e><p><l>ός</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>οί</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="σπίτι__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>α</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="αγόρι__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>α</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="χρονών__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="αδερφ__n">
    	<e><p><l>ή</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ές</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="σκύλο__n">
    	<e><p><l>ς</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ι</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="σήμερα__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="χρόνο__n">
    	<e><p><l>ς</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ι</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="κορίτσι__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>α</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="παιδί__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>α</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="γάτ__n">
    	<e><p><l>α</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ες</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="μητέρ__n">
    	<e><p><l>α</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ες</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="παράθυρ__n">
    	<e><p><l>ο</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>α</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="δέντρ__n">
    	<e><p><l>ο</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>α</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="χέρι__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>α</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="μάτι__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>α</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="παιχνίδι__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>α</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="τραπέζι__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>α</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="κεφάλι__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>α</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="ήχο__n">
    	<e><p><l>ς</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ι</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="απ__n">
    	<e><p><l>άντηση</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>αντήσεις</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="ερ__n">
    	<e><p><l>ώτηση</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ωτήσεις</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="καρέκλ__n">
    	<e><p><l>α</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ες</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="πουλ__n">
    	<e><p><l>ί</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ιά</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="ζώ__n">
    	<e><p><l>ο</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>α</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="κάτι__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="νερό__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="χθές__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>


	<!-- SECTION: Challenge Text Adjectives -->

	<pardef n="ζεστός__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="ωραίος__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="κρύος__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="μεγάλος__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="μικρός__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="παλιός__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="μικρός__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="χαρούμενος__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<!-- SECTION: Prepositions -->

	<pardef n="σχετικά__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="pr"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="πάνω__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="pr"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="απέναντι__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="pr"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="μετά__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="pr"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="κατά__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="pr"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="ανάμεσα__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="pr"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="γύρω__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="pr"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="ως αποτέλεσμα του__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="pr"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="στο__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="pr"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="στις__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="pr"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="πρίν__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="pr"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="πίσω__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="pr"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="δίπλα__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="pr"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<e lm="γραμμόφωνο"><i>γραμμόφωνο</i><par n="γραμμόφων__n"/></e>
	<e lm="κήπος"><i>κήπος</i><par n="κήπ__n"/></e>
	<e lm="καιρός"><i>καιρός</i><par n="καιρ__n"/></e>
	<e lm="σπίτι"><i>σπίτι</i><par n="σπίτι__n"/></e>
	<e lm="αγόρι"><i>αγόρι</i><par n="αγόρι__n"/></e>
	<e lm="χρονών"><i>χρονών</i><par n="χρονών__n"/></e>
	<e lm="αδερφή"><i>αδερφή</i><par n="αδερφ__n"/></e>
	<e lm="σκύλος"><i>σκύλος</i><par n="σκύλο__n"/></e>
	<e lm="σήμερα"><i>σήμερα</i><par n="σήμερα__n"/></e>
	<e lm="χρόνος"><i>χρόνος</i><par n="χρόνο__n"/></e>
	<e lm="κορίτσι"><i>κορίτσι</i><par n="κορίτσι__n"/></e>
	<e lm="παιδί"><i>παιδί</i><par n="παιδί__n"/></e>
	<e lm="γάτα"><i>γάτα</i><par n="γάτ__n"/></e>
	<e lm="μητέρα"><i>μητέρα</i><par n="μητέρ__n"/></e>
	<e lm="παράθυρο"><i>παράθυρο</i><par n="παράθυρ__n"/></e>
	<e lm="δέντρο"><i>δέντρο</i><par n="δέντρ__n"/></e>
	<e lm="χέρι"><i>χέρι</i><par n="χέρι__n"/></e>
	<e lm="μάτι"><i>μάτι</i><par n="μάτι__n"/></e>
	<e lm="παιχνίδι"><i>παιχνίδι</i><par n="παιχνίδι__n"/></e>
	<e lm="απάντηση"><i>απάντηση</i><par n="απ__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ερώτηση"><i>ερώτηση</i><par n="ερ__n"/></e>
	<e lm="τραπέζι"><i>τραπέζι</i><par n="τραπέζι__n"/></e>
	<e lm="καρέκλα"><i>καρέκλα</i><par n="καρέκλ__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ήχος"><i>ήχος</i><par n="ήχο__n"/></e>
	<e lm="πουλί"><i>πουλί</i><par n="πουλ__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ζώο"><i>ζώο</i><par n="ζώ__n"/></e>
	<e lm="χέρι"><i>χέρι</i><par n="χέρι__n"/></e>
	<e lm="κεφάλι"><i>κεφάλι</i><par n="κεφάλι__n"/></e>
	<e lm="κάτι"><i>κάτι</i><par n="κάτι__n"/></e>
	<e lm="νερό"><i>νερό</i><par n="νερό__n"/></e>
	<e lm="χθές"><i>χθές</i><par n="χθές__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ζεστός"><i>ζεστός</i><par n="ζεστός__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ωραίος"><i>ωραίος</i><par n="ωραίος__n"/></e>
	<e lm="κρύος"><i>κρύος</i><par n="κρύος__n"/></e>
	<e lm="μεγάλος"><i>μεγάλος</i><par n="μεγάλος__n"/></e>
	<e lm="μικρός"><i>μικρός</i><par n="μικρός__n"/></e>
	<e lm="παλιός"><i>παλιός</i><par n="παλιός__n"/></e>
	<e lm="μικρός"><i>μικρός</i><par n="μικρός__n"/></e>
	<e lm="χαρούμενος"><i>χαρούμενος</i><par n="χαρούμενος__n"/></e>
	<e lm="σχετικά"><i>σχετικά</i><par n="σχετικά__n"/></e>
	<e lm="πάνω"><i>πάνω</i><par n="πάνω__n"/></e>
	<e lm="απέναντι"><i>απέναντι</i><par n="απέναντι__n"/></e>
	<e lm="μετά"><i>μετά</i><par n="μετά__n"/></e>
	<e lm="κατά"><i>κατά</i><par n="κατά__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ανάμεσα"><i>ανάμεσα</i><par n="ανάμεσα__n"/></e>
	<e lm="γύρω"><i>γύρω</i><par n="γύρω__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ως αποτέλεσμα του"><i>ως αποτέλεσμα του</i><par n="ως αποτέλεσμα του__n"/></e>
	<e lm="στο"><i>στο</i><par n="στο__n"/></e>
	<e lm="στις"><i>στις</i><par n="στις__n"/></e>
	<e lm="πρίν"><i>πρίν</i><par n="πρίν__n"/></e>
	<e lm="πίσω"><i>πίσω</i><par n="πίσω__n"/></e>
	<e lm="δίπλα"><i>δίπλα</i><par n="δίπλα__n"/></e>
	<e lm="απέναντι"><i>απέναντι</i><par n="απέναντι__n"/></e>
